Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

Parks and Recreation Areas

11-9-101. Purpose of part.

The general assembly finds that the state of Tennessee and its subdivisions should enjoy the benefits of private, local and federal assistance programs for the planning and development of the outdoor recreation resources of the state, including the acquisition of lands and waters and interests therein. It is the purpose of this part to provide authority to enable the state of Tennessee and its subdivisions to participate in the benefits of such programs.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1201.

11-9-102. Cooperative planning, developing and acquiring outdoor recreational resources.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, in cooperation with the state planning office and other state, federal, local and private agencies, is authorized to prepare, maintain and keep up to date a comprehensive plan for the development of the outdoor recreation resources of the state, to develop, operate and maintain outdoor recreation areas and facilities of the state, and to acquire lands, waters and interest in lands and waters for such areas and facilities.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; T.C.A., § 11-1202.

Compiler's Notes. The state planning office, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 1995, ch. 501, effective June 12, 1995.

11-9-103. New areas acquired for parks or recreation.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, with the approval of the governor, may select, and by purchase, gift or lease, acquire and make a part of the park system any new area which in the commissioner's judgment should be developed as a state park, or recreation area.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-1203.

11-9-104. Powers and duties of commissioner of environment and conservation.

The commissioner of environment and conservation may apply to any appropriate agency or officer of the United States for participation in or the receipt of aid from any federal programs respecting outdoor recreation.

The commissioner may enter into contracts and agreements with the United States or any appropriate agency thereof, keep financial and other records relating thereto, and furnish to appropriate officials and agencies of the United States such reports and information as may be reasonably necessary to enable such officials and agencies to perform their duties under such programs.

In connection with obtaining the benefits of such programs, the commissioner shall coordinate the commissioner's activities with and represent the interest of all agencies and subdivisions of the state having interest in the planning, development, and maintenance of outdoor recreation resources and facilities.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(139); T.C.A., § 11-1204; Acts 1982, ch. 560, § 3.

11-9-105. Local and private funds.

The commissioner of environment and conservation may receive local and private funds for the purpose of carrying out this part.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 5; T.C.A., § 11-1205.

11-9-106. State's share of funds required before agreement — Public maintenance of areas and facilities — Federal-aid funds to subdivisions.

The commissioner of environment and conservation shall make no commitment or enter into any agreement pursuant to an exercise of authority under this part until the commissioner has determined that sufficient funds are available to the commissioner for meeting the state's share, if any, of project costs.

It is the legislative intent that, to such extent as may be necessary to assure proper operation and maintenance of areas and facilities acquired or developed pursuant to any program participated in by the state under authority of this part, such areas and facilities shall be publicly maintained for outdoor recreation purposes.

The commissioner may enter into and administer agreements with the United States or any appropriate agency thereof for planning, acquisition, and development projects involving participating federal aid funds on behalf of any subdivision or subdivisions of this state; provided, that such subdivision or subdivisions give necessary assurances to the commissioner that they have available sufficient funds to meet their shares, if any, of the cost of the project and that the acquired or developed areas will be operated and maintained at the expense of such subdivision or subdivisions for public outdoor recreation use.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 6; T.C.A., § 11-1206.

11-9-107. Funds deposited in state treasury — Disbursement.

Any federal, local or private funds which may be received under this part shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to an account for the purpose of carrying out this part. The funds in this account, unless otherwise directed by federal law, shall be disbursed in the usual manner as state funds. All disbursements are to be subject to the approval of the governor and of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1965, ch. 181, § 7; T.C.A., § 11-1207.

11-9-108. Parks and recreation programs technical advisory service — Appropriation from federal funds.

There is created in the department of environment and conservation a technical advisory service to assist county and municipal governments in the establishment and operation of parks and recreation programs by providing technical and other advice. The source of funding for this service is hereby specified as being the administrative funds apportioned to the department each year from the federal land and water conservation fund.

Acts 1978, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 105, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 11-1208.